Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.250

Finding—Consumer protection act.

The legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2002 c 111 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 111: See note following RCW 18.16.010.